Hawaii statutes.
§414D-145 Call and notice of meetings.
(a) Unless the articles, bylaws, or subsection (c) provides otherwise, regular
meetings of the board may be held without notice.

(b) Unless the articles, bylaws, or subsection
(c) provides otherwise, special meetings of the board shall be preceded by at
least two days' notice to each director of the date, time, and place, but not
the purpose, of the meeting.

(c) In corporations without members, any board
action to remove a director or to approve a matter that would require approval
by the members if the corporation had members, shall not be valid unless each
director is given at least seven days' notice that the matter will be voted
upon at a directors' meeting or unless notice is waived pursuant to section 414D‑146.

(d) Unless the articles or bylaws provide
otherwise, the presiding officer of the board, the president, or twenty per
cent of the directors then in office may call and give notice of a meeting of
the board. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 37, §11]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next